Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1814.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY Section 8, Chapter 377, O.S.L.


2024 (74 O.S. Supp. 2025, Section 5090.1), is amended to read as


follows:


Section 5090.1. A. There is hereby created within the


Legislature the Legislative Evaluation and Development Committee.


The Legislative Evaluation and Development Committee shall review


financing for individual incentive packages including, but not


limited to, packages offering tax incentives, funds for economic


development, and, when the annual investment exceeds Twenty Million


Dollars ($20,000,000.00), excluding funding from existing incentives


for any business, new or existing currently in this state, or when


one or more of the incentives in the incentive package is not

Req. No. 2766 Page 1


authorized under current law or an amendment by the Legislature is


being sought to one or more currently existing incentives included


in the incentive package. In addition to the required review of


certain incentive packages as prescribed by this section, the


Committee may, in its discretion, also review potential economic


development projects presented by private sector businesses or state


or other political subdivision authorities which would be financed


by public funds.


B. The Legislative Evaluation and Development Committee shall


evaluate and propose economic projects provided by the Division on


Economic Development, Growth, and Expansion within the Oklahoma


Department of Commerce. The Committee shall consist of:


1. Four members of the Senate to be appointed by the President


Pro Tempore of the Senate, one of whom shall be from the minority


party; and


2. Four members of the House of the Representatives to be


appointed by the Speaker of the House of Representatives, one of


whom shall be from the minority party.


The President Pro Tempore of the Senate, or his or her designee,


and the Speaker of the House of Representatives, or his or her


designee, shall serve as co-chairs for the Committee.


C. The quorum of the Committee shall consist of at least five


members. Meetings of the Committee shall be governed by joint rules


of the Legislature. Members of the Committee may receive

Req. No. 2766 Page 2


reimbursement from the Legislative Service Bureau for actual and


necessary expenses incurred in connection with their duties as


members of the Committee in accordance with other provisions of law


relating to travel reimbursement for members of the Legislature.


Members serving on this Committee shall submit to nondisclosure


agreements and adhere to the confidentiality of the material


discussed in meetings that affects the economic development of this


state.


SECTION 2. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-2-2766 TEK 1/14/2026 9:54:09 PM





















Req. No. 2766 Page 3